Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

Substantive Provisions

5-5-101. Basic legislative unit — Name changes.

The county legislative body is established as a basic legislative unit of each county of this state; provided, that this subsection (a) shall not apply to counties that have already adopted the metropolitan form of government.

Effective September 1, 1978, except in any county organized under the consolidated government provisions of the Constitution of Tennessee, article XI, § 9, the quarterly county court, county council and any other forms of county legislative bodies are abolished and all legislative powers that remained with such court, council and other forms of legislative bodies are hereby vested in the county legislative body. The county legislative body is further vested with all legislative powers and duties vested in justices of the peace prior to May 11, 1978.

References to the quarterly county court, county council or other county legislative body appearing elsewhere in this code shall be deemed references to the county legislative body.

References to the magistrates, justices of the peace, members or membership of such court, council or body appearing elsewhere in this code shall be deemed references to the members of the county legislative body.

Code 1858, §§ 4179, 4180, 4186 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 44; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 1; 1837-1838, ch. 135, § 1); Acts 1875, ch. 70, §§ 1-3; integrated in Shan., § 5992; Code 1932, § 10193; Acts 1967, ch. 235, § 1; T.C.A. § 5-528; Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 9; 1979, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-501.

Cross-References. County government, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Law Reviews.

General Sessions Courts: Origin and Recent Legislation (Paul M. Bryan and Isadore B. Baer), 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 667 (1957).

Attorney General Opinions. County commission meetings: quorum and majority vote requirements; requirements as to particular type of space or facility for meetings. OAG 12-109, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (12/14/12).

Where county commission has hired an employee in the valid exercise of its authority, a county mayor may not unilaterally terminate that employee unless expressly authorized. Nor may a county mayor defund or abolish an entire county department without the approval of the county commission. OAG 14-28, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/7/14).

Members of a county legislative body can establish partisan caucuses for the purpose of outlining and meeting party objectives and goals but meetings of a partisan caucus of a county legislative body may be subject to the Open Meetings Act. OAG 14-96, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (10/30/14).

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection. 90 A.L.R.5th 273.

5-5-102. Membership.

The county legislative body shall be composed of not less than nine (9) nor more than twenty-five (25) members.

There shall be at least nine (9) districts in the county legislative body in any county designated as a Class 2 county before January 1, 1999, as established by § 8-24-101.

Members shall reside within and be qualified voters of the districts that they represent.

Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, any county employee, otherwise qualified to serve as a member of the county legislative body, shall not be disqualified from such legislative office by reason of being a county employee.

No person elected or appointed to fill the office of county mayor, sheriff, trustee, register, county clerk, assessor of property, or any other county-wide office filled by vote of the people or the county legislative body, shall also be nominated for or elected to membership in the county legislative body. After June 18, 2005, a director of schools shall not be qualified to serve as a member of the county legislative body.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

No more than three (3) members shall be elected from any one (1) district.

Members shall serve terms of four (4) years or until their successors are elected and qualified.

Members of the county legislative body shall be elected in the regular August election in 1978 and every four (4) years thereafter.

The members of the county legislative body shall be known individually as county commissioners and collectively as the board of county commissioners.

The term of office for members of the county legislative body shall begin on September 1 next succeeding their election.

The county legislative body shall have discretionary authority to determine whether each office in multi-member districts will be separately designated on the ballot, with candidates required to run and to be elected on the basis of such separately designated offices within the district.

No candidate shall qualify for more than one (1) such separately designated office within a multi-member district.

In any county designated as a Class 2 county before January 1, 1999, as established by § 8-24-101, each office in multi-member districts shall be separately designated on the ballot, and candidates shall run and be elected on the basis of such separately designated offices within the district.

If a vacancy shall occur in the office of a member of the county legislative body, the vacancy shall be filled as provided for in § 5-1-104(b).

Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 8, 10; 1979, ch. 175, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-502; Acts 1980, ch. 658, § 1; 1980, ch. 785, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1981, ch. 219, § 1; 1981, ch. 293, § 1; 1981, ch. 318, § 2; 1986, ch. 765, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2005, ch. 471, § 1; 2008, ch. 871, § 2; 2016, ch. 1072, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2005, ch. 471, § 2 provided that nothing in that act shall be construed as having the effect of removing any incumbent from office or abridging the term of any official prior to the end of the term for which such official was elected.

Acts 2005, ch. 471, § 3 provided that the provisions of that act shall not apply to any person who is, on June 18, 2005, serving as both a director of schools and a member of the county legislative body.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted former (c)(3) which read: “(3)(A) Any member of a local governing body of a county or a municipality who is also an employee of such county or municipality may vote on matters in which such member has a conflict of interest if the member informs the governing body immediately prior to the vote as follows:“Because I am an employee of (name of governmental unit), I have a conflict of interest in the proposal about to be voted. However, I declare that my argument and my vote answer only to my conscience and to my obligation to my constituents and the citizens this body represents.“(B) In the event a member of a local governing body of a county or a municipality has a conflict of interest in a matter to be voted upon by the body, such member may abstain for cause by announcing such to the presiding officer. Any member of a local governing body of a county or municipality who abstains from voting for cause on any issue coming to a vote before the body shall not be counted for the purpose of determining a majority vote.“(C) The vote of any person having a conflict of interest who does not inform the governing body of such conflict as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(A) shall be void if challenged in a timely manner. As used in this section, “timely manner” means during the same meeting at which the vote was cast and prior to the transaction of any further business by the body.“(D) Nothing in this subdivision (c)(3) shall be construed as altering, amending or otherwise affecting § 12-4-101(a). In the event of any conflict between this subdivision (c)(3) and § 12-4-101(a), § 12-4-101(a) shall prevail.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1072, § 6. May 20, 2016.

Cross-References. Composition of county legislative body, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 1.

Filling of vacancies in county offices, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 2.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. County or school board employee serving on county legislative body, OAG 98-0112, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (6/16/98).

Service as director of schools and county commission member in same county, OAG 99-195, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 203 (9/28/99).

Members of a county legislative body should be deemed “public officers” of the county, rather than mere “employees” of the county, OAG 00-153, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (10/9/00).

A county commission may impose a limit on the number of one-year terms a member may serve as chair, OAG 00-174, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/20/00).

A county commissioner can be an employee of the county highway commission, so long as the commissioner observes the voting rules set out in T.C.A. § 12-4-101(c), OAG 01-084, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (5/23/01).

A county commissioner is probably not prohibited from also being a member of the county highway commission because that office is not elected by a county-wide vote, OAG 01-084, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (5/23/01).

A person can simultaneously be a state employee, a member of the Democratic Party Executive Board, and a member of the school board, OAG 01-144, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 151 (9/4/01).

Filling of vacancies in county offices, OAG 07-022, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (2/27/07).

Constitutionality of private act requiring nonpartisan elections for county mayor and members of the county legislative body, OAG 08-191, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 236 (12/29/08).

Conflict of interest of county commissioner also employed or formerly employed by a county department. OAG 11-50, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 52 (6/16/11).

Ability of county commissioner to serve as clerk and master for the chancery court in the same county; ability to also engage in private practice of law. OAG 14-23, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/26/14).

5-5-103. Officers.

In counties electing a county mayor as provided in § 5-6-102(1) and (2), there shall be a chair and chair pro tempore.

The legislative body, at its first session on or after September 1 of each year, shall elect from its membership a chair and a chair pro tempore; provided, that the county legislative body may elect the county mayor to be its chair; provided further, that such election shall confer no additional powers or authority to the chair so elected other than as presiding officer that are not otherwise provided by law.

If any county commission elects as its chair the county mayor, and such county mayor accepts the position of chair of the county commission, then the county mayor shall relinquish the county mayor's veto power, as provided in § 5-6-107, for so long as the county mayor remains chair of the county commission.

In counties having a population of not less than eight thousand four hundred (8,400) nor more than eight thousand five hundred (8,500), according to the 1970 or any subsequent federal census, having a county administrator who was empowered by private act prior to September 1, 1978, to preside over the county legislative body, such county administrator shall continue to preside as chair, notwithstanding this chapter and chapter 6 of this title, nor shall the county administrator have the power of veto over legislation passed by the county legislative body, this chapter and chapters 1 and 6 of this title notwithstanding.

This subsection (b) does not apply to:

Counties with a population between two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) and three hundred thousand (300,000);

Any county having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-six thousand (276,000) nor more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand (277,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census; or

Counties with a population in excess of six hundred thousand (600,000) by the 1970 federal census.

The chair of the legislative body shall preside over the sessions of the legislative body.

When the regular chair is unable or fails to attend the meetings of the legislative body, the regular chair shall notify the chair pro tempore, and the chair pro tempore shall attend, discharge the duties of the office, and be vested with all the powers of the regular chair while engaged therein.

The compensation of the chair and chair pro tempore shall be fixed by the legislative body, but such compensation, if fixed on a per diem basis, shall not be less than the amount fixed for the members of the legislative body; provided further, that the compensation of the chair pro tempore shall not exceed the compensation allowed the chair for like services.

In the absence of the chair and the regular chair pro tempore, the county legislative body may appoint, temporarily, a chair pro tempore to preside over the meeting who is vested with all the powers, for this purpose and for the time being, of the regular chair, or regular chair pro tempore.

In the event the county mayor is absent or intends to be absent for more than twenty-one (21) days, or is incapacitated or otherwise unable to perform the duties of the county mayor's office, the county legislative body shall appoint the chair to serve until the absence or disability is removed. Any contest of disability or its removal shall be adjudicated in the chancery court of such county. While the chair is serving as county mayor, the chair pro tempore shall preside over sessions of the legislative body.

The chair of the county legislative body may designate, from time to time, another member of the county legislative body to sit in the chair's place on any board, authority or commission that the chair serves upon by virtue of holding the office of chair of the county legislative body. Any such designee shall have such powers, including the power to vote, as are otherwise conferred upon the chair of the county legislative body when serving upon such board, authority or commission. At any such meeting attended by the chair of the county legislative body, only the chair of the county legislative body shall exercise voting power.

If the office of the county mayor should become vacant pursuant to § 8-48-101, the chair, or if the county mayor served as the chair, the chair pro tempore shall serve as interim county mayor until the vacancy is filled pursuant to § 5-1-104. The interim county mayor shall have the same powers, duties and bond as provided by chapter 6 of this title.

This subsection (i) shall not apply if the method of filling the vacancy in the office of the county mayor is established by a metropolitan charter or a private act.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 11; 1979, ch. 54, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-503; Acts 1981, ch. 384, §§ 1-3; 1985, ch. 163, § 1; 1996, ch. 831, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. A county commission may impose a limit on the number of one-year terms a member may serve as chair, OAG 00-174, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (11/20/00).

Status of interim county mayor as member of county commission. OAG 11-2, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/11).

Lewis County highway advisory commission. OAG 12-74, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (7/19/12).

5-5-104. Regular meetings.

Regular meetings of each county legislative body shall be held at the time, day and place set by resolution of each legislative body.

There shall be at least four (4) regular meetings of the county legislative body each year.

Special meetings of the county legislative body may be called by the county mayor or by petition of a majority of the members of the county legislative body in accordance with § 5-5-105.

No business shall be transacted, or any appointment made, or nominations confirmed, except in public session.

This section shall not apply to any Class 1 county established by § 8-24-101, that has by private act adopted regular meetings of its legislative body and procedures for calling special meetings of such body.

Code 1858, § 4181 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 135, § 1); Shan., § 5993; mod. Code 1932, § 10194; Acts 1951, ch. 266, § 1; 1965, ch. 50, § 1; 1967, ch. 91, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-502; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-504; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. County commission meetings: quorum and majority vote requirements; requirements as to particular type of space or facility for meetings. OAG 12-109, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (12/14/12).

5-5-105. Special meetings.

The county mayor has the power to convene the legislative body in special session when, in the county mayor's opinion, the public necessities require it.

Upon written application to the chair of the legislative body by the county mayor or by a majority of the members of such body, then in that instance, it shall be mandatory for the chair to call a special session of such body.

The convening date of such body shall not be more than fifteen (15) days nor less than forty-eight (48) hours from the time of the filing of such application with the chair.

This subsection (a) shall not apply to counties of Class 1 as established by § 8-24-101.

The county mayor shall be authorized to call a special session of the county legislative body for emergency purposes only by publication in a newspaper published in the county, and by personal notification to the members of the county legislative body at least two (2) days before the time of the convening of the county legislative body, in any county that authorizes its county mayor to act in accordance with this subsection (b), by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.

The call or notice shall specify the objects and purposes for which such special session is called, and no other business but that embraced in such call shall be transacted during such special session.

This subsection (b) shall apply only to any county having a population not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) and not greater than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census.

The call shall be made by publication in some newspaper published in the county, or by personal notices sent by the county clerk, at least five (5) days before the time of the convening of the county legislative body, which call or notice shall specify the objects and purposes for which the special session is called, and no other business but that embraced in the call shall be transacted during the sitting of the special term.

In the event no newspaper is published in the county, the notice shall be by personal service upon all the members of the county legislative body, such service to contain the purpose for which the body is convened, and to be at least five (5) days before the time for convening.

Acts 1889, ch. 257, § 1-3; Shan., §§ 5997-5999; Code 1932, §§ 10195-10197; Acts 1957, ch. 16, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 5-503, 5-504; Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 13, 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 11, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-505; Acts 1983, ch. 241, §§ 1-3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 10.

5-5-106. Attendance at meetings.

Every member of the county legislative body shall be required to attend each and every session of the body, and allowed to vote and draw pay for attendance.

Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 1; Shan., § 6000; Code 1932, § 10198; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-506.

5-5-107. Compensation of members.

The several county legislative bodies are authorized to fix the compensation of their membership in attending sessions of the county legislative body and duly authorized committees thereof.

The counties are hereby classified in accordance with § 8-24-101, and the compensation fixed by the county legislative body for attending sessions of the body shall in no case be less than the applicable amount as follows:

Counties of the third class $35/day

Counties of the fourth class $30/day

Counties of the fifth class $25/day

Counties of the sixth class $20/day

Counties of the seventh class $20/day

Counties of the eighth class $20/day

Upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its membership, the county legislative body of any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) nor more than two hundred eighty-six thousand (286,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall fix the salary of the members of the county legislative body by June 30, 1999, to become effective July 1, 1999. On July 1, 2000, and each July 1 thereafter, the compensation for members of the county legislative body shall be adjusted to reflect the same percentage increase the county mayor of such county is to receive.

A county may adopt a resolution to pay members of the legislative body:

An amount greater than the minimum daily compensation for attendance at meetings of the body as provided in subdivision (b)(1), or at committee meetings for which the member is an appointed member;

A base salary; or

A base salary and an amount greater than or equal to the minimum daily compensation for attendance at meetings of the body as provided in subdivision (b)(1), or at committee meetings for which the member is an appointed member. Notwithstanding subsection (d), a county opting to pay members under this subdivision (c)(3) may set the compensation rate for attendance at committee meetings of the legislative body.

The compensation fixed by the county legislative body for attending duly authorized committee meetings of such body shall be one half (½) of the compensation paid for attending regular sessions of the body.

Any increase in compensation for members of the county legislative body does not take effect until the beginning of the term following the next election of county commissioners after the resolution increasing the compensation is adopted.

Acts 1974, ch. 736, § 1; 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A., § 5-507; Acts 1980, ch. 687, § 1; 1990, ch. 1001, § 1; 1991, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 121, § 1; 1999, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2020, ch. 536, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (c), which read: “The amount provided in this section, or a greater amount provided by resolution duly adopted by the county legislative body, shall be paid to the members for each day's attendance at meetings of the body or any duly authorized committee thereof, or a greater amount provided by resolution duly adopted by the county legislative body as a stated salary per month.”; and added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 536, § 3. March 19, 2020.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. A county legislative body has the option of compensating its members either in the form of a so-called “per diem” payment for each day's attendance at regular and committee meetings or in the form of a stated salary per month, OAG 00-153, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (10/9/00).

County commission may raise or lower the compensation of its members during the present term, as long as they maintain the statutory minimum and are not covered by the population restrictions of subdivision (b)(2) of this section, OAG 04-015, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (2/05/04).

Member of a county legislative body may not accept an amount less than that set by the majority of the body, OAG 04-015, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (2/05/04).

This section authorizes only uniform compensation for all members, OAG 05-004, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/05/05).

5-5-108. Quorum.

A majority of the members of the county legislative body of each county shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business by the bodies in regular or special sessions.

Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 2; Shan., § 6001; Code 1932, § 10199; Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10199; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-508.

Attorney General Opinions. County commission meetings: quorum and majority vote requirements; requirements as to particular type of space or facility for meetings. OAG 12-109, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (12/14/12).

5-5-109. Voting.

A majority of all the members constituting the county legislative body, and not merely a majority of the quorum, shall be required to:

Elect county officials required by law to be elected by the body;

Fix salaries;

Appropriate money; and

Transact all other business coming before the county legislative body in regular or special sessions.

If the members of the county legislative body are equally divided upon any question coming before them upon which they may lawfully act, then and only then, a county mayor serving as chair may cast a deciding vote.

If the person serving as chair of the county legislative body is a regular member of the county legislative body, such person may not break a tie vote in the capacity of chair, but may cast a vote in the first instance as a regular member of the body.

Code 1858, § 4190 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 2); Acts 1875, ch. 63, § 2; integrated in Shan., § 6019; Code 1932, § 10218; Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 10218; Acts 1973, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 934, § 15; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-509; Acts 1983, ch. 138, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 5-5-109, which provides methods for presenting business to a county legislative body, T.C.A. § 5-5-110, does not conflict with which requires a majority vote of all members of the county legislative body to transact business, OAG 03-001, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/03/03).

5-5-110. Business presented by chair.

All business for the action of the county legislative body shall be presented to the chair, who shall announce the same to the county legislative body and take the vote thereon.

No business shall be acted on by the body unless presented as required in subsection (a), except by the consent of a majority of the members present.

Code 1858, § 4188 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 106, § 1); Shan., § 6012; Code 1932, § 10211; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-510.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 5-5-110, which provides methods for presenting business to a county legislative body, does not conflict with T.C.A. § 5-5-109, which requires a majority vote of all members of the county legislative body to transact business, OAG 03-001, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/03/03).

5-5-111. Filling vacancies — Notice to legislative body — Notice to public — Nominations — Appointment by vote of legislative body — Challenge of appointment — Deadline — Applicability of provisions.

Whenever an office is required to be filled, or a vacancy occurs in any office required to be filled, by the county legislative body, the county clerk shall provide notice to every member of the county legislative body of the need to fill the office or vacancy. If the office of county clerk is vacant, the notice shall be provided by the county clerk's deputy. If, in addition, there is no deputy county clerk, notice shall be provided by the acting chair of the county legislative body. In accordance with § 8-48-108, the formal notice to members required by this subdivision (a)(1) is directory and may be waived by the members of the county legislative body if all members have constructive notice of the vacancy or opening through other sources of information.

In addition to the notice provided for in subdivision (a)(1), the presiding officer of the county legislative body shall cause public notice to be given in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least seven (7) days prior to the meeting of the body at which the office is to be filled, notifying the public of the vacancy or opening and specifying the office or offices to be filled at the meeting.

Before the county legislative body votes or considers any motion or resolution regarding the office to be filled, the chair shall allow registered voters of the county an opportunity to submit names to the county legislative body for consideration. The names may be submitted in writing to the chair prior to the meeting or may be submitted in person at the meeting. In order for a name to be considered, a member of the county legislative body must subsequently nominate the person. Members of the county legislative body may also nominate a candidate or candidates to fill the office or vacancy without the name being submitted by a voter. Nominations do not require a second. If the person nominated is not present at the meeting, the person making the nomination shall submit a signed statement from the nominee that the nominee is willing to serve in the office if appointed.

Should a member of the county legislative body accept a nomination for an office or vacancy that is required by the Constitution of Tennessee to be filled by the county legislative body, the member shall be prohibited from voting on the appointment or any motions or resolutions relative to making the appointment until the office or vacancy is filled. For the purposes of determining a majority, the membership of the county legislative body shall be reduced to reflect any member or members prohibited from voting on the appointment. If a member of the county legislative body is subsequently appointed to fill the office or vacancy, the member shall immediately resign from the county legislative body upon accepting the appointment. If the member does not receive the appointment, the member shall not be required to resign and may continue the member's duties on the county legislative body upon the conclusion of the vote on the appointment.

After nominations cease, the county legislative body may discuss the nominations and may, at the discretion of the chair, interview nominees or allow nominees the opportunity to address the county legislative body. Upon motion passed by the majority of the members, the vote to make the appointment may be postponed to a subsequent meeting; provided, that adequate public notice of the meeting is given in accordance with title 8, chapter 44.

To receive an appointment, a nominee must receive the votes of a majority of the members of the county legislative body eligible to vote on the appointment. The county legislative body shall adopt rules of procedure for eliminating nominees in cases where there are multiple nominees for an appointment and no nominee receives a majority of the votes after the initial vote. No secret balloting shall be permitted. Each member's vote regarding the appointment process shall be recorded by the clerk and entered on the minutes of the county legislative body. A tie vote of the county legislative body regarding an appointment may be broken in the same manner that other tie votes of the body may be broken.

Any complaint challenging the legality of an appointment made by the county legislative body shall be filed with the chancery court of the county within ten (10) days of the date of the appointment.

When filling a vacancy in offices required to be filled by the county legislative body, the county legislative body shall fill the vacancy in accordance with the deadline provided in § 5-1-104.

This section shall not apply to any county that has a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This section shall not apply to any county having a population of not less than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand four hundred (897,400) nor more than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred (897,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Code 1858, § 817; Shan., § 1144; mod. Code 1932, § 1904; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 15, 24; 1979, ch. 16, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-512; Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 3; 2009, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2009, ch. 14, § 3 provided that the amendments to § 5-5-111(b) and (c) and Acts 2008, ch. 871, which rewrote § 5-5-111, shall not be interpreted to require a member of a county legislative body to resign from the county legislative body after accepting an appointment if the member could have legally accepted the appointment prior to May 6, 2008, without resigning. Any action taken by any board, commission or committee on or after May 6, 2008, shall not be invalidated due to any other interpretation of Acts 2008, ch. 871.

Cross-References. Filling of vacancies in county offices, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 232; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Status of interim county mayor as member of county commission. OAG 11-2, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/7/11).

County commission meetings: quorum and majority vote requirements; requirements as to particular type of space or facility for meetings. OAG 12-109, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (12/14/12).

5-5-112. Voting prohibited if conflict of interest — Opting out of section by resolution.

No member of the legislative body of a county who is also an employee of the same county or whose spouse is an employee of the same county may vote on matters in which such member has a conflict of interest. A conflict of interest is created under this section when a member is voting on a matter which, if approved by the legislative body, would increase the pay or benefits of that member or that member's spouse. The vote of any member having a conflict of interest shall be void if challenged in a timely manner. As used in this subsection (a), “timely manner” means during the same meeting at which the vote was cast and prior to the transaction of any further business by the body.

Subsection (a) shall not prohibit a member of a local governing body of a county from voting on the budget, appropriation resolution, or tax rate resolution, or amendments thereto, unless the vote is on a specific amendment to the budget or a specific appropriation or resolution in which the member has a conflict of interest.

Any member of a local governing body of a county who abstains from voting for cause on any issue coming to a vote before the body shall not be counted for the purpose of determining a majority vote. This subsection (c) shall not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government and having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Nothing in this section alters, amends, or otherwise affects § 12-4-101(a). In the event of any conflict between this section and § 12-4-101(a), § 12-4-101(a) shall prevail.

The legislative body of any metropolitan form of government or charter form of government may opt out of this section by resolution.

Acts 2016, ch. 1072, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-112 (Code 1858, § 4194 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 6014; Code 1932, § 10213; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-514), concerning the timing of elections for county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

For U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1072, § 6. May 20, 2016.

5-5-113. Required orientation training for members of county legislative bodies.

Each member of a county legislative body shall:

No later than one hundred twenty (120) days after election or appointment, complete orientation training provided by the University of Tennessee's county technical assistance service (CTAS). This subdivision (a)(1) applies only to members newly elected or appointed on or after April 12, 2018; and

Complete at least seven (7) hours of continuing education training provided or approved by CTAS annually. The period for compliance under this subdivision (a)(2) begins on September 1, 2018. This subdivision (a)(2) does not apply to:

A person appointed to fill a vacancy on a county legislative body until September 1 after the person's appointment;

An incumbent in office on April 12, 2018, until the incumbent is separated from office for any reason and is subsequently elected or appointed to serve as a member of a county legislative body; and

Any commissioner after eight (8) years of service.

CTAS may provide the training required under subsection (a) in person or by any other means available.

The comptroller of the treasury shall, at least annually, post on its website the name of each member of a legislative body and the hours of training required and completed for each member in compliance with subsection (a).

Acts 2018, ch. 718, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-113 (Acts 1875, ch. 63, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1887, ch. 236, § 2; Shan., § 6003; Code 1932, § 10201; impl. am. Acts 1935, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10201; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-515), concerning notice to the county legislative body for election of county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 718, § 2. April 12, 2018.